California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) (1) Each area agency on aging shall create a plan that considers available data and population trends, assesses the needs for services provided under this division reflective of the community needs, identifies sources for funding those services, and develops and implements a plan for delivery of those services based on those needs. Each plan shall include developing area home- and community-based systems of care that maintain individuals in their own homes or least restrictive environment, providing better access to these services through information and referral, outreach, and transportation, and advocating for older adults on local, state, and national levels.

(2) Each plan shall use the California Elder Economic Security Standard Index as a reference when making decisions about allocating
 existing resources to specify the costs in the private market of meeting the basic needs of elders in each planning and service area. This paragraph shall be implemented only if the California Elder Economic Security Standard Index is updated and made available to the area agencies on aging, and if the available public data used to calculate each California Elder Economic Security Standard Index data element is calculated and updated using county level information specific to each California county and made available to the area agencies on aging in a format that displays each county’s specific data.

(e) Area agencies on aging shall function as the community link at the local level for development of home- and community-based services provided under the department’s programs.

(f) The area agencies on aging shall implement subdivision (b) of Section 9100 at the local level, with
 particular emphasis on coordinating with the local systems to enable individuals to live out their lives with maximum independence and dignity in their own homes and communities through the development of comprehensive and coordinated systems of home- and community-based care. This division shall not preclude local determination and designation of service coordinators other than area agencies on aging, for development and implementation of the long-term care integration pilot projects set forth in Article 4.05 (commencing with Section 14139.05) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(g) In fulfilling their mission, area agencies on aging shall build upon the resources and the commitment unique to each community and shall be guided by a 10-point description of a community-based system that shall do all of the following:

(1) Have a visible focal point of contact where anyone can go
 or call for help, information, or referral on any aging issue.

(2) Provide a range of service options.

(3) Ensure that these options are readily accessible to all older individuals, whether independent, semi-independent, or totally dependent, no matter what their income.

(4) Include a commitment of public, private, and voluntary resources committed to supporting the system.

(5) Involve collaborative decisionmaking among public, private, voluntary, religious, and fraternal organizations, as well as older adults and consumers in the community.

(6) Offer special help or targeted resources for the most vulnerable older adults, those in danger of losing their independence.

(7) Provide effective referral from agency to agency to ensure that information or assistance is received, regardless of how or where contact is made in the community.

(8) Evidence sufficient flexibility to respond with appropriate individualized assistance, especially for the vulnerable older individuals.

(9) Have a unique character that is tailored to the specific nature of the community.

(10) Be directed by leaders in the community who have the respect, capacity, and authority necessary to convene all interested persons to assess needs, design solutions, track overall success, stimulate change, and plan community responses for the present and for the future.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 19.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9401.

Area agencies on aging and other county agencies that provide services to older adults through an established multidisciplinary team, including the county departments of public social services, health, mental health, alcohol and drug abuse, and the public guardian, may provide information regarding older adult clients only to other county agencies with staff designated as members of a multidisciplinary team that are, or may be, providing services to the same individuals for purposes of identifying and coordinating the treatment of individuals served by more than one agency. The county patients’ rights advocate shall report any negative consequences of the implementation of this exception to confidentiality requirements to the local mental health director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9402.

The Legislature hereby declares and recognizes each area agency on aging advisory council as a principal advocate body on behalf of older individuals within a planning and service area. Area agency on aging advisory councils shall operate in conformance with applicable federal requirements. The local advisory councils shall meet regularly and provide advice and consultation on issues affecting the provision of services provided locally to older individuals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9403.

To the extent provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 18773 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the Legislature hereby recognizes the Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California, comprised of the chairs of the local advisory councils.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9404.

An individual’s receipt of services under the In-Home Supportive Services Program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300), Part 3, Division 9) shall not be the sole cause for denial of any services provided by area agencies on aging or their contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 16.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Home-Delivered Meals Act [9500. - 9501.]

9500.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Home-Delivered Meals Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.

(a) The department shall allocate any new funds to area agencies on aging based upon the existing intrastate funding formula, but without regard to subdivision (b) of Section 9112.

(b) Funds may be expended by area agencies on aging for any of the following purposes:

(1) To serve older individuals on waiting lists.

(2) To increase the number of days per week that meals are provided under the Home-Delivered Meals Program from five to seven.

(3) To provide modified diets specific to the needs of individuals being served by the Home-Delivered Meals Program.

(4) To establish an active outreach program to ensure that California’s older adults are aware of the availability of home-delivered meals services.

(5) For capital outlay to expand the physical capacity of local needs programs to serve unmet need.

(6) To fund transportation costs related to the delivery of home-delivered meals.

(7) To otherwise deal with the unmet home-delivered nutrition needs identified by the area agency on aging in accordance with the criteria developed by the department pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) The department shall encourage area agencies on aging to include in the home-delivered meals programs alternative service models designed to reduce the social isolation
 of older adults who are economically and nutritionally disadvantaged and who do not have permanent housing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 20.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Community-Based Services Network [9530. - 9538.]

9530.

(a) As part of its role in providing leadership to the area agencies on aging in the development of systems of home and community-based services to maintain individuals in their own homes or least restrictive homelike environments and to ensure the availability of information and awareness of their benefits, rights, and responsibilities, the department shall contract for an array of state-funded community-based services specified in this division to older individuals and functionally impaired adults.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to facilitate central points of access through integration of the financing and local management of the community-based services programs, specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) under the area agencies on aging. Except for any new funds appropriated, the department shall contract for these services in the planning and service areas where the services are currently provided.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that contracts for services specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) be awarded through a competitive procurement process, considering factors such as cost and scope of services. Where not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law or regulations, programs may benefit from the economical use of shared resources that are colocated. This chapter shall not prohibit the development or continuation of the colocation of these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9530.5.

Consistent with Article 4.05 (commencing with Section 14139.05) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9, the Legislature reaffirms the need to restructure the array of categorical programs that offer medical, social, and other support services that are funded and administered by a variety of federal, state, and local agencies. It is in the interest of the state, as a whole, to address the duplication and fragmentation of the long-term care system and the home- and community-based services needs of older adults and adults with functional impairments. Ideally, individuals needing long-term care should be able to access the health and social services system through a central point of entry, disclose basic demographic information, and be referred to the appropriate sources for assessment, care planning, and purchase of
 services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 21.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9531.

(a) This chapter establishes the Community-Based Services Network.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that a Community-Based Services Network be initiated by the department in order to do all of the following:

(1) Locally integrate the state-funded community-based services programs, specified in this division, for older adults and adults with functional impairments.

(2) Provide increased local flexibility in setting priorities for the services contained within the six state General Fund programs specified in Sections 9542 to 9547, inclusive.

(3) Contract responsibility
 for local management of the state-funded community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) to participating area agencies on aging.

(c) Each participating area agency on aging shall ensure the continuation of the funding match currently required for the community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540). The match may consist of either cash or in-kind services.

(d) Each participating area agency on aging shall have responsibility for local program management of the community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 22.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9532.

In addition to the definitions already contained in this division, the following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Adult with functional impairment” means an adult 18 years of age or older, who is at risk of institutional placement due to a chronic physical and mental disability, including disabilities caused by organic disorders or diseases, that restrict the individual’s ability to independently perform activities of daily living, who has an inadequate informal or formal support network, and who has to leave their home without supportive home- and community-based services.

(b) “Community-based services programs” means the programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(c) “Local program management” means the area agency on aging’s responsibility to oversee the operation of programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(d) “Participating area agency on aging” means an area agency on aging that contracts with the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 23.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9533.

The department shall be responsible for, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Reviewing and approving the Community-Based Services Network component of the area plans of participating area agencies on aging.

(b) Entering into contracts with area agencies on aging to carry out the requirements set forth in this chapter and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) that shall include the requirements set forth in subdivisions (c) and (e) for area agencies local management responsibilities under this division.

(c) Developing the respective responsibilities for the department and participating area agencies on aging.

(d) Developing model language for area agencies on aging to use in their procurement and final contracts with direct service providers.

(e) Enforcing statewide requirements to ensure compliance with the statutes and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(f) Ensuring that a participating area agency on aging that has not been directly providing the services specified under the programs provided for in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) shall not commence directly providing these services until the department has reviewed and concurred with the area plan or update documentation demonstrating that the area agency can provide a comparable quality of these services at least as economically and at an enhanced benefit to the consumer or that there is not an adequate supply of these services in the affected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9534.

(a) Contracts between the department and participating area agencies on aging shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) For the health insurance counseling and advocacy program, participating area agencies on aging that cover a single planning and service area shall maintain the existing service arrangements during the 1997–98 fiscal year, unless either a contractor terminates the agreement according to the terms and conditions of the existing contract, the state and area agencies on aging terminate the agreement for legal cause under the terms and conditions of the existing contract, or if state funds cease to be budgeted for the specified services.

(c) For the health insurance counseling and advocacy program, participating area agencies on aging that cover multiple planning and service areas shall enter into mutual agreements or joint powers agreements, or both, to maintain the existing service arrangements for the health insurance counseling and advocacy program for the 1997–98 fiscal year and for one additional year, if needed, but not to extend beyond June 30, 1999, unless either a contractor terminates the agreement according to the terms and conditions of the existing contract, the state and area agency on aging terminate the agreement for legal cause under the terms and conditions of the existing contract, or if state funds cease to be budgeted for the specified services.

(d) For the programs other than the health insurance counseling and advocacy program specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540), participating area agencies on aging shall maintain the existing service arrangements during the 1997–98 fiscal year, unless either a contractor terminates the agreement according to the terms and conditions of the existing contract, the state and area agency on aging terminate the agreement for legal cause under the terms and conditions of the existing contract, or if state funds cease to be budgeted for the specified services.

(e) For the programs other than the health insurance counseling and advocacy program specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540), participating area agencies on aging shall maintain the existing service arrangements during the 1998–99 fiscal year, unless a contractor terminates the agreement according to the terms and conditions of the existing contract, the state and the area agency on aging terminate the agreement for legal cause under the terms and conditions of the existing contract, or state funds cease to be budgeted for the specified services.

(f) Subject to fiscal years specified in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, participating area agencies on aging that elect not to provide the community-based services specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) directly, shall provide for the services through contracts awarded on the basis of a competitive proposal or bid process, or both, that is conducted at least once every four years, except that an area agency on aging shall not be required to conduct a full competitive process if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) A request for application is published, and full outreach is conducted to reasonably notify all potential interested parties, such as formal advertisements in trade journals and association publications.

(2) No applicants, in addition to current contractors, respond to the request for application.

(3) Complete documentation of the outreach effort is maintained by the area agency on aging.

(g) Any dispute regarding the procurement of, and the terms and conditions of the direct service contracts procured by the area agency on aging shall be resolved locally, consistent with subdivision (k) of Section 9535, and as specified in the local area agency procurement documents and contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9535.

Area agencies on aging shall be responsible for, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Contracting with the department to locally manage the community-based programs specified in and in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(b) Integrating the community-based services programs contracted under this chapter into the local area plan development process.

(c) Where the area agency on aging proposes to redirect funding under this chapter, the area agency shall ensure that it has submitted its recommendations to a locally formed advisory committee, that shall include consumers of long-term care
 services, representatives of local organizations of older adults, adults with functional impairments, representatives of employees who deliver direct long-term care services, and representatives of organizations that provide long-term care services. At least one-half of the members of the advisory committee shall be consumers of services provided under this chapter or their representatives.

(d) In addition, where the area agency on aging proposes to redirect funding under this chapter, an administrative action plan shall be developed and shall receive the approval of the area agency’s governing board, which shall consider the input received pursuant to subdivision (c). The administrative action plan shall receive the governing board’s approval prior to submission to the department for final state approval. The administrative action plan shall be an update to the area plan.

(e) Effective in the 1999–2000 fiscal year, and except for the health insurance counseling and advocacy program, determining which of the community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) and contracted under the authority in this chapter will continue to be funded and the amount of funding to be allocated for that purpose.

(f) Subject to Section 9534, providing directly, through contracts with other local governmental entities, or through competitively procured contracts, the community-based services programs.

(g) When required pursuant to Chapter 875 of the Statutes of 1995, and subject to the annual Budget Act, relinquishing funding originally contracted under this chapter and the associated local management of the community-based services programs, and except for the health insurance counseling and advocacy program, to the
 long-term care integration pilot program.

(h) Monitoring direct services contract performance and ensuring compliance with the requirements of this chapter and any other relevant state or federal laws or regulations and the nondiscrimination requirements set forth under Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 4135) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(i) Appropriately expending and accounting for all funds associated with this chapter and providing access to all program books of account and other records to state auditors.

(j) Maintaining a systematic means of capturing and reporting to the department all required community-based services program data, specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

(k) The governing body of each participating area agency shall establish a process within its area plan for requesting and providing a hearing for the programs specified under this chapter and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540). A hearing shall be provided upon the request of either provider whose existing direct services contract is either terminated prior to its expiration date or reduced in scope outside of the state or federal budget process, or any applicant that is not selected in a direct service contract procurement process due to the alleged presence of a conflict of interest, procedural error or omission in solicitation request, or the lack of substantial evidence to support the award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 24.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9536.

(a) The state funds available for the community-based services programs may not be expended for services other than those specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540), and shall be limited to the state funds appropriated to the department for the implementation of this chapter and Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(b) Reimbursement for administrative costs incurred by a participating area agency on aging in operating the community-based services network shall not exceed the administrative funding ratio allowed for area agencies on aging under Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001, et seq.), and as specified in the contract.

(c) The funding provided under this chapter may not be used to supplant the local matching requirements of other state and federal programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9537.

The funding contracted by the department to the participating area agencies on aging under this chapter shall consist of both of the following:

(a) The proportion of local assistance funds appropriated to, and encumbered by, the department for direct services under the community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540).

(b) The proportion of state operations cost savings realized by the department that are directly attributable to the local management of the community-based services programs specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540) and any additional funds subsequently appropriated for the administrative costs incurred by the area agencies on aging.

(c) Subject to the annual Budget Act, in no event shall the amount appropriated to the participating area agency on aging for purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b), be less than that appropriated in the base fiscal year of 1997–98.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9538.

(a) Persons involved in the procurement or management of services shall not engage in a conflict of interest, real or apparent.

(b) Staff and volunteers shall not engage in the business of insurance or other related activity while associated with the community-based services programs.

(c) For the services covered under the community-based services programs, no area agency or contract officer, employee, or board member shall use the formal names or acronyms for the services except in conjunction with the provision of covered services, official duty, and participation in specifically sanctioned events.

(d) No information concerning any individual that is acquired by the department, the area agencies on aging, or service providers in the administration and delivery of community-based services specified in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 9540), including the fact that an individual has sought or received services, shall be disclosed without the informed written consent of the individual to whom the information applies or unless pursuant to court order, after noticed hearing, irrespective of whether the person or party seeking disclosure already has the information, has other means of obtaining the information, had obtained a subpoena to obtain the information, or asserts any other basis or justification for disclosure of the information. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the exchange of information between the department, the area agencies on aging, and service providers which is necessary for the effective state and local administration and oversight of the programs involved, or the sharing of information with state licensing and certification agencies or law enforcement entities when the information is necessary for the performance of their respective duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Community-Based Services Programs [9540. - 9547.]

9540.

It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that older adults and adults with functional impairments receive needed services that will enable them to maintain the maximum independence permitted by their functional ability and remain in their own home or communities for as long as possible. Except where otherwise provided, community-based services programs under the Community-Based Services Network shall meet all of the minimum requirements specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 25.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9541.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The purpose of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program is to provide Medicare beneficiaries and those imminent of becoming eligible for Medicare with counseling and advocacy as to Medicare, private health insurance, and related health care coverage plans, on a statewide basis, and preserving service integrity.

(2) Lack of health insurance literacy skills can lead to misinformation or mismatched insurance needs.

(3) As health care options become increasingly complex, the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program plays a vital role in clarifying all aspects
 of the Medicare Program to the beneficiary served.

(b) The department shall be responsible for, but not limited to, doing both of the following:

(1) To act as a clearinghouse for information and materials relating to Medicare, managed care, health and long-term care related life and disability insurance, and related health care coverage plans.

(2) To develop additional information and materials relating to Medicare, managed care, and health and long-term care related life and disability insurance, and related health care coverage plans, as necessary.

(c) Notwithstanding the terms and conditions of the contracts, direct services contractors shall be responsible for, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Advising, educating, and empowering Medicare beneficiaries to make informed choices among the array of options to best fit their needs.

(2) Community education to the public on Medicare, long-term care planning, private health and long-term care insurance, managed care, and related health care coverage plans.

(3) Counseling and informal advocacy with respect to Medicare, long-term care planning, private health and long-term care insurance, managed care, and related health care coverage plans.

(4) Referral services for legal representation or legal representation with respect to Medicare appeals, Medicare related managed care appeals, and life and disability insurance problems. Legal services provided under this program shall be subject to the
 understanding that the legal representation and legal advocacy shall not include the filing of lawsuits against private insurers or managed health care plans. In the event that legal services are contracted for by the agency separately from counseling and education services, a formal system of coordination and referral from counseling services to legal services shall be established and maintained.

(5) Educational services supporting long-term care educational activities aimed at the general public, employers, employee groups, older adult organizations, and other groups expressing interest in long-term care planning issues.

(6) Educational services emphasizing the importance of long-term care planning, promotion of self-reliance and independence, and options for long-term care.

(7) To the extent possible, support
 additional emphasis on community educational activities that would provide for announcements on television and in other media describing the limited nature of Medicare, the need for long-term care planning, the function of long-term care insurance, and the availability of counseling and educational literature on those subjects.

(8) Recruitment, training, coordination, and registration, with the department, of health insurance counselors, including a large contingent of volunteer counselors designed to expand services as broadly as possible.

(9) A systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data, as specified by the department.

(d) Participants who volunteer their time for the health insurance counseling and advocacy program may be reimbursed for expenses incurred, as
 specified by the department.

(e) The department, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the Department of Insurance shall jointly develop interagency procedures for referring and investigating suspected instances of misrepresentation in advertising or sales of services provided by Medicare, managed health care plans, and life and disability insurers and agents.

(f) (1) A health insurance counselor shall not provide counseling services under this chapter, unless the health insurance counselor is registered with the department.

(2) A registered volunteer health insurance counselor shall not be liable for a negligent act or omission in providing counseling services under this chapter. Immunity shall not apply to health insurance counselors for any grossly negligent act or omission or
 intentional misconduct.

(3) A registered volunteer health insurance counselor shall not be liable to any insurance agent, broker, employee thereof, or similarly situated person, for defamation, trade libel, slander, or similar actions based on statements made by the counselor when providing counseling, unless a statement was made with actual malice.

(4) Before providing any counseling services, a health insurance counselor shall disclose, in writing, to a recipient of counseling services pursuant to this chapter that the counselor is acting in good faith to provide information about health insurance policies and benefits on a volunteer basis, but that the information shall not be construed to be legal advice, and that the counselor is generally not liable unless their acts and omissions are grossly negligent or there is intentional misconduct on the part of the counselor.

(5) The department shall not register any applicant under this section unless the applicant has satisfactorily completed training that is approved by the department, and that consists of at least 24 hours of training that shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following subjects:

(A) Medicare.

(B) Life and disability insurance.

(C) Managed care.

(D) Retirement benefits and principles of long-term care planning.

(E) Counseling skills.

(F) Any other subject determined by the department to be necessary to the provision of counseling services under this
 chapter.

(6) The department shall not register any applicant under this section unless the applicant has completed all training requirements and has served an internship of cocounseling of at least 10 hours with an experienced counselor and is determined by the local program manager to be capable of discharging the responsibilities of a counselor. An applicant shall sign a conflict of interest and confidentiality agreement, as specified by the department.

(7) A counselor shall not continue to provide health insurance counseling services unless the counselor has received continuing education and training, in a manner prescribed by the department, on Medicare, managed care, life and disability insurance, and other subjects during each calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 26.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9541.5.

(a) The California Department of Aging shall assess annually a fee of not less than one dollar and forty cents ($1.40), but not more than one dollar and sixty-five cents ($1.65), on a health care service plan for each person enrolled in a health care service plan as of December 31 of the previous year under a prepaid Medicare program that serves Medicare eligible beneficiaries within the state, and on a health care service plan for each enrollee under a Medicare supplement contract, including a Medicare Select contract, as of December 31 of the previous year, to offset the cost of counseling Medicare eligible beneficiaries on the benefits and programs available through health maintenance organizations instead of the traditional Medicare provider
 system.

(b) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State HICAP Fund for the implementation of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program, and shall be available for expenditure for activities as specified in Section 9541 when appropriated by the Legislature.

(c) The department may use up to 7 percent of the fee collected pursuant to subdivision (a) for the administration, assessment, and collection of that fee.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this act and funding the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program, to maintain a ratio of two dollars ($2) collected from the Insurance Fund to every one dollar ($1) collected pursuant to subdivision (a). This ratio shall be reviewed by the Department of Finance within 30 days of January 1, 1999, and
 biennially thereafter to examine changes in the demographics of Medicare imminent populations, including, but not limited to, the number of citizens residing in California 55 years of age and older, the number and average duration of counseling sessions performed by counselors of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program, particularly the number of counseling sessions regarding prepaid Medicare programs and counseling sessions regarding Medi-Gap programs, and the use of other long-term care and health-related products. Upon review, the Department of Finance shall make recommendations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee regarding appropriate changes to the ratio of funding from the Insurance Fund and the fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the revenue raised from the fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (a), and according to the ratio established pursuant to subdivision (d),
 be used to partially offset and reduce the amount of revenue appropriated annually from the Insurance Fund for funding of the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program.

(f) There shall be established in the State Treasury a “State HICAP Fund” administered by the California Department of Aging for the purpose of collecting fee assessments described in subdivision (a), and for the sole purpose of funding the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that, starting in the 2005–06 fiscal year, two million dollars ($2,000,000) of additional funding shall be made available to local HICAP programs, to be derived from an increase in the HICAP fee and the corresponding Insurance Fund pursuant to subdivision (d). Any additional funding shall only be used for local HICAP funding and shall not be used for department or local area agencies
 on aging administration.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9757.5 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 587.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9542.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the Alzheimer’s Day Care-Resource Center Program is to provide access to specialized day care resource centers for individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementia-related disorders and support to their families and caregivers.

(b) The following definitions shall govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Participant” means an individual with Alzheimer’s disease or a disease of a related type, particularly the participant in the moderate to severe stages, whose care needs and behavioral problems may make it difficult for the individual to participate in existing care programs.

(2) “Other dementia-related disorders” means those irreversible brain disorders that result in the symptoms described in paragraph (3). This shall include, but is not limited to, multi-infarct dementia and Parkinson’s disease.

(3) “Care needs” or “behavioral problems” means the manifestations of symptoms that may include, but need not be limited to, memory loss, aphasia (communication disorder), becoming lost or disoriented, confusion and agitation, with the potential for combativeness, and incontinence.

(4) “Alzheimer’s day care resource center” means a center developed pursuant to this section to provide a program of specialized day care for participants with dementia.

(c) The department shall adopt policies and guidelines to carry out the purposes of this section, and the adoption thereof shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.
